North Dakota, session 69, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - GOVERNMENT SPENDING DATABASE.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the feasibility
of the establishment of a government spending database. The study must include:
a. A review of the training services necessary for school board members, superintendents,
principals, and business managers regarding the government spending database,
including best practices, personnel management, financial operations, facility planning,
and regulatory compliance.
b. The feasibility of establishing a database that compiles the following information for each
expenditure:
(1) The amount paid.
(2) The payment date.
(3) The recipient name.
(4) The paying entity.
(5) The employee position, if for a personnel payment.
(6) For a school district, with respect to educational materials:
(a) A description of curriculum.
(b) The publisher and author of a textbook.
(c) A description of software specifications and developer identification.
(7) A standardized categorization using United States census bureau codes for state
and local transactions and nationally recognized standardized codes for school
districts and institutions of higher education.
c. The feasibility of establishing a database capable of providing:
(1) Search capabilities.
(2) Data aggregation tools.
(3) Download options in common formats.
(4) Anonymous salary and benefit information.
(5) Regular updates of all information.

H. B. NO. 1329 - PAGE 2
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

H. B. NO. 1329 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1329.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 8 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 4 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State